New York, session 2025-2026, A306.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 22. a. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "veteran" means a 4 person who served in the United States army, navy, air force, marines, 5 coast guard, and/or reserves thereof, and/or in the army national guard, 6 air national guard, New York guard and/or New York naval militia and who 7 (1) has received an honorable or general discharge from such service, or 8 (2) has a qualifying condition, as defined in section one of the veter- 9 ans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad conduct 10 or dishonorable from such service, or (3) is a discharged LGBT veteran, 11 as defined in section one of the veterans' services law, and has 12 received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such 13 service. 14 b. Every veteran who is enrolled on a full-time basis as an undergrad- 15 uate student in good standing, at an institution within the state 16 university system, shall upon application be granted academic credits 17 without limitation towards their degree for completion of courses that 18 were part of such veteran's military training or service if the 19 completed courses meet the standards of the institution awarding such 20 credits. No fee, tuition or other charge shall be assessed against a 21 veteran who qualifies for such credit pursuant to this subdivision. 22 c. The board of trustees shall adopt such procedures as are necessary 23 to fully implement the provisions of this subdivision. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01435-01-5 A. 306 2 1 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. a. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "veteran" means a 4 person who served in the United States army, navy, air force, marines, 5 coast guard, and/or reserves thereof, and/or in the army national guard, 6 air national guard, New York guard and/or New York naval militia and who 7 (1) has received an honorable or general discharge from such service, or 8 (2) has a qualifying condition, as defined in section one of the veter- 9 ans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad conduct 10 or dishonorable from such service, or (3) is a discharged LGBT veteran, 11 as defined in section one of the veterans' services law, and has 12 received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such 13 service. 14 b. Every veteran who is enrolled on a full-time basis as an undergrad- 15 uate student in good standing, at an institution within the city univer- 16 sity system, shall upon application be granted academic credits without 17 limitation towards their degree for completion of courses that were part 18 of such veteran's military training or service if the completed courses 19 meet the standards of the institution awarding such credits. No fee, 20 tuition or other charge shall be assessed against a veteran who quali- 21 fies for such credit pursuant to this subdivision. 22 c. The board of trustees shall adopt such procedures as are necessary 23 to fully implement the provisions of this subdivision. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 25 the date on which it shall have become a law.